Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-3,159
Health plan; self-funded employee
benefit plan; assertion of contractual rights to proceeds; prohibited acts;
section; applicability.

(1) No health plan and no self-funded employee benefit plan
to the extent not preempted by federal law shall assert any contractual rights
to the proceeds of any resources purchased by or on behalf of the policyholder,
subscriber, certificate holder, or enrollee, including medical payments coverage
under a motor vehicle insurance policy, uninsured or underinsured motorist
coverage, accident or disability income coverage, specific disease or illness
coverage, or hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity coverage.

(2) This
section shall not (a) affect the coordination of benefits between health plans
or self-funded employee benefit plans, (b) prevent the coordination of benefits
between a health plan or self-funded employee benefit plan and medical payments
coverage under a motor vehicle insurance policy if such coordination of benefits
applies medical payments coverage to deductible, copayment, and coinsurance
amounts after discounts provided through the health plan or self-funded employee
benefit plan, or (c) prevent the application of the medical payments coverage
under a motor vehicle insurance policy to items not covered by a health plan
or self-funded employee benefit plan.

(3) For
purposes of this section, health plan means an individual or group sickness
and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state except for (a) policies that provide coverage
for specified disease or other limited-benefit coverage or hospital indemnity
or other fixed indemnity coverage or (b) self-funded employee benefit plans
to the extent preempted by federal law.

Laws 2013, LB479, § 1.